Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202529-4003
Applicability of act.

(1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or after January 1, 1997:

(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the following:

(A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when the person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any other offense in this section;

(B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;

(C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;

(D) Sexual abuse by a school worker pursuant to section 28-316.01;

(E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree pursuant to section 28-320.01;

(F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319.01;

(G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;

(H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;

(I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;

(J) Conduct relating to child sexual abuse material under section 28-1805 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section 28-1804;

(K) Knowingly possessing or receiving any child sexual abuse material pursuant to subsection (1) or (5) of section 28-1803;

(L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;

(M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication device pursuant to section 28-320.02;

(N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or

(O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i)(A) through (1)(a)(i)(N) of this section;

(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon;

(iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional facility, or any other public or private institution or is under probation or parole as a result of pleading guilty to or being found guilty of a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section prior to January 1, 1997; or

(iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.

(b) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2010:

(i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section, has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the following:

(I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;

(II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;

(III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;

(IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;

(V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;

(VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;

(VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;

(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under the act pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;

(IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;

(X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;

(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree pursuant to section 28-322.02;

(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree pursuant to section 28-322.03;

(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section 28-322.04;

(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;

(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section 28-707;

(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to section 28-833; or

(XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I) through (1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.

(B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to the offenses listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V), (VI), (VII), (IX), and (X) of this section, a court shall have found that evidence of sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are defined in section 28-318, was present in the record, which shall include consideration of the factual basis for a plea-based conviction and information contained in the presentence report;

(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon; or

(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States.

(c) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2020:

(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05; or

(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.

(d) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or after January 1, 2023:

(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-831, and the court determines either by notification of sex offender registration responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that the human trafficking was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor and not solely labor trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or

(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon.

(2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under this section shall be required to comply with the act during the appeals process.

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 564, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 943, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 713, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 25;

Laws 2009, LB285, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB61, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB519, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB630, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB881, § 26;

Laws 2022, LB1246, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 20.

1. Applicability

2. Standard of review

3. Nonsexual offenses

4. Other jurisdictions

1. Applicability

The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to an individual whose crime occurred prior to January 1, 1997, if the individual was incarcerated or on probation or parole for that crime on and after January 1, 1997. In re Interest of D.H., 281 Neb. 554, 797 N.W.2d 263 (2011).

A crime that is generally not a typical sex crime may still require registration under the Sex Offender Registration Act if the court finds that evidence of sexual penetration or sexual contact was present in the record. The State must establish the fact of sexual penetration or sexual contact by clear and convincing evidence. State v. Sindt, 32 Neb. App. 610, 3 N.W.3d 100 (2024).

The defendant's convictions for third degree assault and false imprisonment required registration under the Sex Offender Registration Act when circumstantial evidence satisfied the requirements of this section, even though DNA reports excluded the defendant as a contributor to the DNA from the victim's external genital swabs. State v. Sindt, 32 Neb. App. 610, 3 N.W.3d 100 (2024).

Incest of an adult is not a registrable offense under the Sex Offender Registration Act. State v. Aguilar-Moreno, 17 Neb. App. 623, 769 N.W.2d 784 (2009).

2. Standard of review

The finding required under subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section should be established by clear and convincing evidence. State v. Norman, 282 Neb. 990, 808 N.W.2d 48 (2012).

3. Nonsexual offenses

A finding under subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section must be made during the proceedings on the underlying conviction or plea and is a judgment on the issue of the Sex Offender Registration Act's application to the defendant, which must be appealed at the end of the proceeding. State v. Ratumaimuri, 299 Neb. 887, 911 N.W.2d 270 (2018).

Before determining that a defendant convicted of a crime not sexual in nature is subject to sex offender registration pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section, the court must provide notice and a hearing and must make the finding whether sexual penetration or sexual contact occurred in connection with the incident that gave rise to the conviction based on the record and the hearing. State v. Norman, 282 Neb. 990, 808 N.W.2d 48 (2012).

Subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section provides that the court's finding shall include consideration of the factual basis for a plea-based conviction and information contained in the presentence report. However, the statute does not limit the court's consideration to such sources and, because a liberty interest is at stake, a meaningful hearing requires consideration of evidence at the hearing as well as the factual basis and the presentence report. State v. Norman, 282 Neb. 990, 808 N.W.2d 48 (2012).

4. Other jurisdictions

A sex offender registrant's actual registration under another jurisdiction's law is conclusive evidence that the registrant was required to register within the meaning of subdivision (1)(a)(iv) of this section. State v. Clemens, 300 Neb. 601, 915 N.W.2d 550 (2018).

Under subdivision (1)(a)(iv) of this section, whether one is "required to register as a sex offender" in another jurisdiction is determined under the laws of the other jurisdiction rather than under Nebraska law. Subdivision (1)(a)(iv) of this section adds no additional requirement that registration in the other jurisdiction must be based on a "conviction" or an offense that would have required the person to register in Nebraska if the offense had been committed in Nebraska. State v. Clemens, 300 Neb. 601, 915 N.W.2d 550 (2018).

A sex offender registrant's actual registration under another jurisdiction's law is conclusive evidence that the registrant was "required" to register within the meaning of subsection (1)(a)(iv) of this section. Skaggs v. Nebraska State Patrol, 282 Neb. 154, 804 N.W.2d 611 (2011).

Subsection (1)(a)(iv) of this section has no residency requirement. Skaggs v. Nebraska State Patrol, 282 Neb. 154, 804 N.W.2d 611 (2011).